Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2126YH (3) 91 as/js H.F. 228 Section 1. Section 725.1, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 b. A person who purchases or offers to purchase services as 3 a partner in a sex act from a person who is under the age of 4 eighteen , or who is reasonably believed to be under the age of 5 eighteen including a law enforcement officer or agent posing as 6 a minor under the age of eighteen, commits a class âDâ felony. 7